Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 37

BUDGET

Part I. Preparation of Budget--Repealed

Section

37-1 to 14 Repealed

Part II. Allotment System

37-31 Intent and policy

37-32 Quarterly allotment periods

37-33 Funds to which allotment system applies

37-34 Appropriations available for allotment;
estimate of

expenses

37-34.5 Department of education; allotment and
expenditure

plan; updates

37-34.6, 34.7 Repealed

37-35 Estimated expenditures; approval

37-36 Modification

37-37 Reduction

37-38 Allotment according to classification
prescribed in

appropriation

37-39 Reduction of allotted amounts for objects
and items

37-40 Exceptions; trust funds

37-41 Appropriations to revert to state
treasury; exceptions

37-41.5 Department of education; carryover of
funds

37-42 Allotment as limit of expenditures;
liability for

excessive expenditure

37-43 Capital improvement project allotment
process

37-44, 45 Repealed

37-46 Transfers of non-general funds to the
general funds

37-47 Reporting of non-general fund information

Part III. Budgetary Control of Special
Funds

37-51 Abolition of special funds; legislative
purpose

37-52 Provisions applicable to special funds

37-52.3 Criteria for the establishment and
continuance of

special funds

37-52.4 Criteria for the establishment and
continuance of

revolving funds

37-52.5 Criteria for the establishment and
continuance of

administratively established accounts and
funds

37-53 Transfer of special funds

37-54 Deposit of state funds in treasury

Part IV. The Executive Budget

37-61 Short title

37-62 Definitions

37-63 Statement of policy

37-64 Governing principles

37-65 Responsibilities of the governor

37-66 Responsibilities of the legislature

37-67 Responsibilities of the department of
budget and

finance

37-68 Responsibilities of agencies

37-68.5 Position ceiling

37-69 The six-year program and financial plan

37-70 Program memoranda

37-71 The budget

37-72 Supplemental budget

37-73 Legislative review

37-74 Program execution

37-75 Variance report

37-76 Publication

37-77 Claims for legislative relief

37-77.5 Claims against the State; remedial
measures

37-78 Schedule of implementation

Part V. General Fund Expenditure Ceiling

37-91 Definitions

37-92 Proposed general fund appropriations;
executive

branch; judicial branch

37-93 Legislature

37-94 Director of finance; duties

Part VI. Council on Revenues

37-111 Council on revenues

37-112 Use of estimates

37-113 Repealed

37-113.1 Council on revenues; estimate of total
personal income

Part VII. Routine Repair and Maintenance

37-121 Routine repair and maintenance; definitions

37-122 Routine repair and maintenance funding needs; report
to

legislature

Note

Pilot project for efficiency measures to be included with
budget documents submitted to the legislature; report to 2017 legislature;
auditor report (no later than March 1, 2017). L 2015, c 67.

Attorney General Opinions

Common law principle authorizing recipient government
agencies to accept and use gifts in accordance with donor's terms, provided
terms are not illegal, has been incorporated in chapter's provisions governing
trust funds. Att. Gen. Op. 92-4.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next